Hawaii statutes.
[§657-21.5] Extension by sentencing of
criminal defendant. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for any
victim of a particular crime, for surviving immediate family members of a
victim, or for the estate of a victim, the statute of limitations for any civil
cause of action against a person convicted of that crime shall be tolled from
the moment the civil cause of action arises until the person convicted of that
crime is released from imprisonment, released from parole, or released from
probation and is no longer under the jurisdiction of the court for that crime,
if:

(1) The crime upon which the civil action is based is
a felony; or

(2) The victim of the crime upon which the civil
action is based is the victim of a "sexually violent offense" or a
"criminal offense against a victim who is a minor", as defined by
section 846E-1. [L 2002, c 201, §1]

Note

The definitions of "sexually violent offense" and
"criminal offense against a victim who is a minor", referred to in
paragraph (2), were deleted from §846E-1 by L 2005, c 45, §3(3).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next